Texas statutes.
EDUCATION CODE

TITLE 3. HIGHER EDUCATION

SUBTITLE F. OTHER COLLEGES AND UNIVERSITIES

CHAPTER 109A. ANGELO STATE UNIVERSITY

Sec. 109A.001. ESTABLISHMENT; SCOPE. (a) Angelo State University is a general academic teaching institution located in the city of San Angelo.

(b) The university is a component institution of the Texas Tech University System and is under the management and control of the board of regents of the Texas Tech University System. The board of regents has the same powers and duties concerning Angelo State University as are conferred on the board by statute concerning Texas Tech University and Texas Tech University Health Sciences Center.

Added by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 179 (H.B. 3564), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2007.

Sec. 109A.002. COURSES AND DEGREES; RULES; AFFILIATION AGREEMENTS; JOINT APPOINTMENTS. (a) The board of regents, with the approval of the Texas Higher Education Coordinating Board, may prescribe courses at the university leading to customary degrees as are offered at leading American educational institutions and may award those degrees, including baccalaureate, master's, and doctoral degrees and their equivalents.

(b) A new department, school, or degree program may not be instituted at the university without the prior approval of the Texas Higher Education Coordinating Board.

(c) The board of regents shall adopt rules for the operation, control, and management of the university as may be necessary for the conduct of the university as one of the first class.

(d) The board may enter into an affiliation or coordination agreement with any other entity or institution in this state to further the purposes of the university.

(e) The board may make joint faculty appointments in Angelo State University and in other institutions under its governance. The board may make a joint faculty appointment in Angelo State University concurrently with the appointment of the faculty member by another institution of higher education in accordance with an affiliation agreement described by Subsection (d). The salary of a person who receives a joint appointment shall be apportioned to the appointing institutions on the basis of services rendered.

Added by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 179 (H.B. 3564), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2007.

Sec. 109A.003. OBLIGATIONS AND BENEFITS OF STATE LAW. The university is subject to the obligations and entitled to the benefits of all laws of this state applicable to all other state institutions of higher education, except that this subchapter prevails to the extent of any conflict between this subchapter and any other law of this state.

Added by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 179 (H.B. 3564), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2007.

Sec. 109A.004. MILITARY TRAINING. The university may not require a student to participate in military training as a condition for admission to or graduation from the university.

Added by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 179 (H.B. 3564), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2007.

Sec. 109A.005. AUTHORITY TO TRANSFER SAN ANGELO MUSEUM OF FINE ARTS. (a) In this section, "nonprofit organization" means an organization exempt from federal income taxation under Section 501(a), Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as an organization described by Section 501(c)(3) of that code.

(b) The board of regents may transfer title to the real property and improvements of the San Angelo Museum of Fine Arts to a nonprofit organization if:

(1) before transferring title, the board of regents holds a public meeting at which the transfer is an agenda item and, in addition to any other notice required, gives notice of the meeting by publishing the subject matter, location, date, and time of the meeting in a newspaper having general circulation in the city of San Angelo;

(2) the board of regents determines that:

(A) the transfer will serve the interests of the university and the public; and

(B) at the time of the transfer, the university does not require the entirety of the real property or improvements for educational purposes; and

(3) the nonprofit organization to which the transfer is proposed to be made has demonstrated, to the satisfaction of the board of regents, that the organization intends to continue to:

(A) use the real property and improvements for public purposes, including educational purposes; and

(B) keep the museum open to the public on a frequent and regular basis.

(c) To make a transfer under this section, the chairman of the board of regents shall execute a deed transferring title to the real property and improvements of the San Angelo Museum of Fine Arts to the nonprofit organization. The deed must:

(1) cite the authorization by the board of regents to make the transfer; and

(2) provide that title to the real property and improvements reverts to the Texas Tech University System if the nonprofit organization:

(A) discontinues using the real property or improvements for public purposes as required by the deed; or

(B) executes a document that purports to convey title.

Added by Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 52 (S.B. 811), Sec. 1, eff. May 19, 2009.